Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-824.01
Applicability of sections.

For condominiums created in this state before January 1, 1984, sections 76-827, 76-829 to 76-831, 76-840, 76-841, 76-869, 76-874, 76-876, 76-884, and 76-891.01, and subdivisions (a)(1) to (a)(6) and (a)(11) to (a)(16) of section 76-860 shall apply to the extent necessary in construing the provisions of such sections which apply to events and circumstances which occur after January 1, 1984, notwithstanding any provisions to the contrary in sections 76-801 to 76-824.

Laws 1983, LB 433, § 82;

Laws 1993, LB 478, § 11.